Hawaii statutes.
I. Dwelling
Unit Revolving Fund

§201H-191 Dwelling unit revolving fund.
(a) There is created a dwelling unit revolving fund. The funds appropriated
for the purpose of the dwelling unit revolving fund and all moneys received or
collected by the corporation for the purpose of the revolving fund shall be
deposited in the revolving fund. The proceeds in the revolving fund shall be
used to reimburse the general fund to pay the interest on general obligation
bonds issued for the purposes of the revolving fund, for the necessary expenses
in administering housing development programs and regional state infrastructure
programs, and for carrying out the purposes of housing development programs and
regional state infrastructure programs, including but not limited to the
expansion of community facilities and regional state infrastructure constructed
in conjunction with housing and mixed-use transit-oriented development
projects, permanent primary or secondary financing, and supplementing building
costs, federal guarantees required for operational losses, and all things
required by any federal agency in the construction and receipt of federal funds
or low‑income housing tax
credits for housing projects.

(b) Subject to the requirements of subsection
(a), proceeds in the revolving fund may be used to establish and operate
regional state infrastructure subaccounts pursuant to section 201H-191.5. [L
2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L 2016, c 132, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next